apertium-tgl-ceb.ceb.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
 <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNÑNgOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnñngopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
 <sdefs>
  <sdef n="n"/>
  <sdef n="part"/>
  <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
  <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
  <sdef n="pr"/>
  <sdef n="sg"/>
  <sdef n="pl"/>
  <sdef n="prn"/>
  <sdef n="p1"/>
  <sdef n="p1i"/>
  <sdef n="p1x"/>
  <sdef n="p2"/>
  <sdef n="p3"/>

  <sdef n="abs"    c="Absolutive" />
  <sdef n="ergp" c="Ergative (Postposed)" />
  <sdef n="erg" c="Ergative (Preposed)" />
  <sdef n="obl"    c="Oblique" />
 </sdefs>
 <pardefs>
  <!-- Particles -->

  <pardef n="mga__part"> 
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>         
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="sa__pr"> 
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>         
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="iro__n"> <!-- dog -->
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>

  <!-- Conjunctions -->

  <pardef n="ug__cnjcoo"> 
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>         
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="tungod__cnjsub"> 
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>         
  </pardef>

  <!-- Proper nouns -->

  <pardef n="Dios__np"> 
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef> 

  <!-- Determiners -->

  <pardef n="ang__det">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>

  <!-- Pronouns -->
  <pardef n="/ako__prn">
   <e><p><l>ako</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>ko</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>nako</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ergp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>ko</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ergp"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>ako</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>akoa</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kanako</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>nako</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/ikaw__prn">
   <e><p><l>ikaw</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>nimo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ergp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>mo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ergp"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>imo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>imoha</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kanimo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>nimo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="/siya__prn">
   <e><p><l>siya</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>niya</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ergp"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>iya</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>iyaha</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kaniya</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>niya</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/kita__prn">
   <e><p><l>kita</l><r>kita<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l><r>kita<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>nato</l><r>kita<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ergp"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>ato</l><r>kita<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>atoa</l><r>kita<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kanato</l><r>kita<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>nato</l><r>kita<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/kami__prn">
   <e><p><l>kami</l><r>kami<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>mi</l><r>kami<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>namo</l><r>kami<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ergp"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>amo</l><r>kami<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>amoa</l><r>kami<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kanamo</l><r>kami<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>namo</l><r>kami<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/kamo__prn">
   <e><p><l>kamo</l><r>kamo<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>mo</l><r>kamo<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>ninyo</l><r>kamo<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ergp"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>inyo</l><r>kamo<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>inyoha</l><r>kamo<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kaninyo</l><r>kamo<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>ninyo</l><r>kamo<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
 
  <pardef n="/sila__prn">
   <e><p><l>sila</l><r>sila<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>nila</l><r>sila<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ergp"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>ila</l><r>sila<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>ilaha</l><r>sila<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kanila</l><r>sila<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>nila</l><r>sila<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
 </pardefs>
 
 <section id="main" type="standard">
  <!-- Particles -->
  <e lm="mga"><i>mga</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>

  <!-- Conjunctions -->
  <e lm="ug"><i>ug</i><par n="ug__cnjcoo"/></e>
  <e lm="tungod"><i>tungod</i><par n="tungod__cnjsub"/></e>
  
  <!-- Prepositions -->
  <e lm="sa"><i>sa</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e>
  <e lm="nga"><i>nga</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e> <!-- ? -->
  
  <!-- Nouns -->
  <e lm="iro"><i>iro</i><par n="iro__n"/></e>
  <e lm="lalaki"><i>lalaki</i><par n="iro__n"/></e>
  <e lm="langit"><i>langit</i><par n="iro__n"/></e>
  <e lm="yuta"><i>yuta</i><par n="iro__n"/></e>
  <e lm="balay"><i>balay</i><par n="iro__n"/></e>

  <!-- Pronouns -->
   
  <e lm="ako"><i/><par n="/ako__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="ko"><i/><par n="/ako__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="nako"><i/><par n="/ako__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="akoa"><i/><par n="/ako__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="kanako"><i/><par n="/ako__prn"/></e> 

  <e lm="ikaw"><i/><par n="/ikaw__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="ka"><i/><par n="/ikaw__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="nimo"><i/><par n="/ikaw__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="mo"><i/><par n="/ikaw__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="imo"><i/><par n="/ikaw__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="imoha"><i/><par n="/ikaw__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="kanimo"><i/><par n="/ikaw__prn"/></e> 
  
  <e lm="siya"><i/><par n="/siya__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="niya"><i/><par n="/siya__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="iya"><i/><par n="/siya__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="iyaha"><i/><par n="/siya__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="kaniya"><i/><par n="/siya__prn"/></e> 
  
  <e lm="kita"><i/><par n="/kita__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="ta"><i/><par n="/kita__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="nato"><i/><par n="/kita__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="ato"><i/><par n="/kita__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="atoa"><i/><par n="/kita__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="kanato"><i/><par n="/kita__prn"/></e> 

  <e lm="kami"><i/><par n="/kami__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="mi"><i/><par n="/kami__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="namo"><i/><par n="/kami__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="amo"><i/><par n="/kami__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="amoa"><i/><par n="/kami__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="kanamo"><i/><par n="/kami__prn"/></e> 
 
  <e lm="kamo"><i/><par n="/kamo__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="mo"><i/><par n="/kamo__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="ninyo"><i/><par n="/kamo__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="inyo"><i/><par n="/kamo__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="inyoha"><i/><par n="/kamo__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="kaninyo"><i/><par n="/kamo__prn"/></e> 
  
  <e lm="sila"><i/><par n="/sila__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="nila"><i/><par n="/sila__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="ila"><i/><par n="/sila__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="ilaha"><i/><par n="/sila__prn"/></e> 
  <e lm="kanila"><i/><par n="/sila__prn"/></e> 
  <!-- Proper Nouns -->
  <e lm="Dios"><i>Dios</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
 </section>
</dictionary>
